New York, session 2025-2026, A11212.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph g of subdivision 4 of section 205-c of the high- 2 way law, as added by chapter 690 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 g. "Designated town" shall mean the town of Lorraine, Jefferson 5 county, and the town of Redfield, Oswego county. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 7 the amendments to section 205-c of the highway law made by section one 8 of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be 9 deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15478-01-6